New Jersey, session 221, S412.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A school district shall, for each grade level, post curriculum plans for each course offered to students on the districts Internet website at least 30 days prior to the beginning of a school year.  Curriculum plans posted pursuant to this section shall include each unit of study, student learning objectives, course themes, and information concerning textbooks and other materials to be used by the district in the implementation of its curriculum plans.  A school district shall update the districts Internet website each time a curriculum plan is updated or revised. b.    In posting information concerning textbooks and other materials pursuant to subsection a. of this section, a school district shall also post information concerning when and where textbooks and other materials used as part of the districts implementation of its curriculum plans will be available for review by the parents or legal guardians of students in the district.  Parents or legal guardians shall be given the opportunity to review the textbooks and other materials prior to the time in which they will be incorporated into classroom instruction. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the first full school year next following the date of enactment.